Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Constitutional Conventions.

Collateral references. —

16 Am. Jur. 2d, Constitutional Law, §§ 11, 22-36.

16 C.J.S., Constitutional Law, §§ 7-11.

Sec. 15.50.070.
Placing question of constitutional convention on ballot.

If during any 10-year period a constitutional convention has not yet been held, and the question of holding a constitutional convention has not been placed before the voters, the lieutenant governor shall direct the director to place the question on the ballot for the next regular statewide general or primary election.

History.

(§ 10.51 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 203 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions concerning placement of the question of a constitutional convention on ballot, see Alaska Const., art. XIII, § 3.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 15.50.080.
Certification of vote.

If a majority of votes cast on the question are in the affirmative, the lieutenant governor shall so certify and shall issue the call for the convention.

History.

(§ 10.52 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.50.090.
Time and manner of selecting delegates.

Delegates to the convention shall be elected at the next statewide general election in the number and manner prescribed in the call for the convention by the lieutenant governor or as provided by law.

History.

(§ 10.53 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.50.100.
Certification of constitutional amendment by convention.

The president of the constitutional convention shall certify to the lieutenant governor each proposed amendment to the constitution adopted by the constitutional convention.

History.

(§ 10.54 ch 83 SLA 1960)